apertium-sme-smj.smj.dix
          <r>ærttasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttatjijge</l>
          <r>ærttasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttatjijge</l>
          <r>ærttasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttatjijgen</l>
          <r>ærttasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttatjijgen</l>
          <r>ærttasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttatjijt</l>
          <r>ærttasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttatjijt</l>
          <r>ærttasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttatjijtga</l>
          <r>ærttasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttatjijtga</l>
          <r>ærttasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttatjijtge</l>
          <r>ærttasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttatjijtge</l>
          <r>ærttasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ærttatjijtgen</l>
          <r>ærttasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ärttatjijtgen</l>
          <r>ærttasj<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/æmmá__Pron_Indef">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æmmá</l>
          <r>æmmá<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ämmá</l>
          <r>æmmá<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æmmága</l>
          <r>æmmá<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ämmága</l>
          <r>æmmá<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ga"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æmmáge</l>
          <r>æmmá<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æmmák</l>
          <r>æmmá<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ämmáge</l>
          <r>æmmá<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ämmák</l>
          <r>æmmá<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="ge"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æmmágen</l>
          <r>æmmá<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ämmágen</l>
          <r>æmmá<s n="Pron"/><s n="Indef"/><s n="Clt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="sæmmá"><i>s</i><par n="s/æmmá__Pron_Indef"/></e>
